Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1009
Entertainment destination center,
defined.

Entertainment
destination center means a facility containing a minimum of two hundred thousand
square feet of gross leasable area adjacent or complementary to an existing
tourism attraction, an approved tourism development project, or a convention
facility, and which provides a variety of entertainment and leisure options
that contain at least six full-service restaurants and at least three additional
entertainment venues, including, but not limited to, live entertainment, multiplex
theaters, large-format theaters, motion simulators, family entertainment centers,
concert halls, virtual reality or other interactive games, museums, exhibitions,
or other cultural and leisure-time activities. Entertainment, food, and drink
options and adjacent lodging shall occupy a minimum of sixty percent of the
total gross area. Other retail stores shall occupy no more than forty percent
of the total gross area.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 9.